Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Examination and Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For examinations for dental licensure, see 12 AAC 28, art. 2.

For continuing professional competence requirements, see 12 AAC 28, art. 4.

For dental hygienist examination, see 12 AAC 28, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers, §§ 6, 13-15.

70 C.J.S., Physicians and Surgeons, §§ 35-37, 41.

Constitutionality and construction of statutes or regulations prohibiting one who has no license to practice dentistry from owning, maintaining or operating an office therefor, 20 ALR2d 808.

Regulation of prosthetic dentistry, 45 ALR2d 1243.

Liability for dental malpractice in provision or fitting of dentures, 77 ALR4th 222.

Sec. 08.36.100.
License required.

Except as provided in AS

08.36.238

and

08.36.254

, a person may not practice, or attempt to practice, dentistry without a license.

History.

(§ 1 art III ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 155 SLA 1968; am § 19 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 22 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 25 ch 53 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, inserted “and

08.36.254

” following “AS

08.36.238

”.

Sec. 08.36.110.
Qualifications for license; interview.

An applicant for a license to practice dentistry shall

provide certification to the board that the applicant

is a graduate of a dental school that, at the time of graduation, is approved by the board;

has successfully passed a written examination approved by the board;

has not had a license to practice dentistry revoked, suspended, or voluntarily surrendered in this state or another state;

is not the subject of an adverse decision based on a complaint, investigation, review procedure, or other disciplinary proceeding within the five years immediately preceding application, or of an unresolved complaint, investigation, review procedure, or other disciplinary proceeding, undertaken by a state, territorial, local, or federal dental licensing jurisdiction;

is not the subject of an unresolved or an adverse decision based on a complaint, investigation, review procedure, or other disciplinary proceeding, undertaken by a state, territorial, local, or federal dental licensing jurisdiction or law enforcement agency that relates to criminal or fraudulent activity, dental malpractice, or negligent dental care and that adversely reflects on the applicant’s ability or competence to practice dentistry or on the safety or well-being of patients;

is not the subject of an adverse report from the National Practitioner Data Bank or the American Association of Dental Boards Clearinghouse for Board Actions that relates to criminal or fraudulent activity, or dental malpractice;

is not impaired to an extent that affects the applicant’s ability to practice dentistry;

has not been convicted of a crime that adversely reflects on the applicant’s ability or competency to practice dentistry or that jeopardizes the safety or well-being of a patient;

pass, to the satisfaction of the board, written, clinical, and other examinations administered or approved by the board; and

meet the other qualifications for a license established by the board by regulation, including education in pain management and opioid use and addiction in the two years preceding the application for a license, unless the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number; approved education may include dental school coursework.

An applicant for licensure may be interviewed in person by the board or by a member of the board before a license is issued. The interview must be recorded. If the application is denied on the basis of the interview, the denial shall be stated in writing, with the reasons for it, and the record shall be preserved.

History.

(§ 2 art III ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1970; am § 7 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 25 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 20, 32 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 23 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 122 SLA 1992; am § 9 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 47 SLA 2005; am §§ 26, 27 ch 53 SLA 2012; am § 3 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations for dental licensure, see 12 AAC 28, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(3), added the language beginning “, including education in pain management” to the end, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.36.114.
Qualifications for acupuncture applicants. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.36.115.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Secs. 08.36.120, 08.36.130.
Signing, photograph, and filing date of application; Examination. [Repealed, § 8 ch 47 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 08.36.140.
Out-of-state examination. [Repealed, § 40 ch 100 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 08.36.150.
Examination in out-of-state dental schools. [Repealed, § 40 ch 100 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 08.36.160.
Contents of examination. [Repealed, § 8 ch 47 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 08.36.170.
Partial examination. [Repealed, § 40 ch 100 SLA 1984.]

Secs. 08.36.180, 08.36.190.
Reexamination; Grading of examination. [Repealed, § 8 ch 47 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 08.36.200.
Waiver of written examination. [Repealed, § 40 ch 100 SLA 1984.]

Secs. 08.36.210 — 08.36.220.
Waiver of examination and issuance of license by reciprocity. [Repealed, § 32 ch 49 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.36.234.]

Sec. 08.36.230.
Practice outside the state. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.36.234.
Licensure by credentials.

The board may waive the examination requirement and license by credentials if the dentist applicant meets the requirements of AS

08.36.110

, submits proof of continued competence as required by regulation, pays the required fee, and has

an active license from a board of dental examiners established under the laws of a state or territory of the United States issued after thorough examination; or

passed an examination as specified by the board in regulations.

A dentist applying for licensure without examination is responsible for providing to the board all materials required by the board to implement this section to establish eligibility for a license without examination. In addition to the grounds for revocation of a license under AS

08.36.315

, the board may revoke a license issued without examination upon evidence of misinformation or substantial omission.

The board shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section, including the form and manner of certification of qualifications under this section.

A dentist applying for licensure without examination shall be interviewed in person by the board or by a member of the board before a license is issued. The interview must be recorded. If the application is denied on the basis of the interview, the denial shall be stated in writing, with the reasons for it, and the record shall be preserved.

History.

(§ 23 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 122 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 24 SLA 2001; am § 10 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 2008; am §§ 28 — 30 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.238.
Exemption from license requirement.

A person enrolled as a student in an accredited school of dentistry may perform procedures as part of a course of study without a license if

the procedures are performed under the direct supervision of a member of the faculty who is licensed under this chapter, or under the direct supervision of a team of licensed faculty dentists, at least one of whom is licensed under this chapter; and

the clinical program has received written approval from the board.

A person practicing dentistry under (a) of this section is subject to all other provisions of this chapter and to other laws and regulations that apply to the practice of dentistry.

History.

(§ 23 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.240.
Issuance and display of license.

The board shall issue a license to each successful dentist applicant who has paid the required fees.
The licensee shall display the license in a conspicuous place where the licensee practices.

History.

(§ 11 art III ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 121 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 100 SLA 1984)

Sec. 08.36.244.
License to practice as specialist required. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Secs. 08.36.246 — 08.36.248.
Qualification for a specialist license; limitation of special practice; suspension or revocation of specialty licenses. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.36.250.
License renewal, lapse, and reinstatement.

At least 60 days before expiration of a license issued under this chapter, the department shall notify the licensed dentist. A licensee who wishes to renew a license shall submit a completed license renewal form, the appropriate fee, and evidence of continued professional competence as required by the board. The department shall, as soon as practicable, issue a new license valid for a stated number of years. Failure to receive notification from the department under this subsection does not exempt a licensee from renewing a license to practice dentistry under this chapter.

When applying for license renewal, a dentist shall report to the board each instance during the prior registration period in which the quality of the licensee’s professional services was the subject of legal action.

A licensed dentist who does not pay the license renewal fee forfeits the dentist’s license. The board may reinstate the license without examination within two years after the date on which payment was due upon written application, proof of continued professional competence, and payment of all unpaid renewal fees and any penalty fee established under AS

08.01.100(b)

.

History.

(§ 12 art III ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 9 ch 155 SLA 1968; am § 7 ch 121 SLA 1972; am § 25 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 20 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 7 ch 14 SLA 2005; am §§ 32, 33 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For certificate duration and renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For special permits, see 7 AAC 27, art. 9.

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For continuing professional competence requirements, see 12 AAC 28, art. 4.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2005 (SB 52), amending (a) of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 42 — 43.

Sec. 08.36.254.
Temporary permit to substitute for an incapacitated dentist.

The board may issue a temporary permit to practice dentistry to a dentist for the purpose of substituting for an incapacitated dentist licensed in this state.

A dentist applying for a temporary permit under (a) of this section shall

hold an active license from a board of dental examiners established under the laws of a state or territory of the United States issued after thorough examination;

pay the required fee; and

meet other qualifications for a temporary permit established by regulation.

A temporary permit issued under this section is valid only to treat patients of the incapacitated dentist at an address listed on the business license of the incapacitated dentist.

The fee for a permit issued under this section is one-fourth of the fee for a biennial license plus the appropriate application fee.

The board may not issue a temporary permit under this section if another dentist licensed under this chapter may reasonably substitute for the incapacitated dentist.

A temporary permit issued under this section is initially valid for 90 consecutive calendar days. Upon request of a permittee, the board shall extend a permit issued under this section for 60 calendar days if, before the expiration of the initial 90-day permit, the permittee submits to the board a completed application form and the fee required under this chapter, except that the board may refuse to grant a request for an extension for the same reasons the board may revoke a license under AS

08.36.315

. Permits and extensions of permits issued to a permittee under this section are not valid for more than 240 calendar days during any consecutive 24 months.

The board may extend a permit issued under this section for a period that exceeds the limit established in (f) of this section if the board determines that the extension is necessary to provide essential dental services and the board has received a clearance report from the

National Practitioner Data Bank; and

United States Drug Enforcement Administration.

In this section, “incapacitated” means impaired by a health condition that renders a dentist unable to practice dentistry for more than 30 days.

History.

(§ 2 ch 29 SLA 2018)

Effective Dates. —

Section 5,
ch. 29, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.36.260.
Branch office registration. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.36.270.
Permits for isolated areas. [Repealed, § 3 ch 26 SLA 1965; § 5 ch 93 SLA 1965.]

Sec. 08.36.271.
Permits for isolated areas. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.36.280.
Temporary permit. [Repealed, § 40 ch 100 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 08.36.285.
Licensing a permittee. [Repealed, § 10 ch 121 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.36.290.
Fees. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]